Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2745.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 9 TLSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh H.F. 2745 DIVISION I 1 PROPERTY TAX REVENUE LIMITATIONS ââ BOND REVENUE USE 2 LIMITATIONS 3 Section 1. Section 11.11, Code 2026, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 11.11 Scope of audits. 6 The written report of the audit of a governmental 7 subdivision shall include the auditorâs opinion as to whether a 8 governmental subdivisionâs financial statements are presented 9 fairly in all material respects in conformity with generally 10 accepted accounting principles or with an other another 11 comprehensive basis of accounting. As a part of conducting an 12 audit of a governmental subdivision, an evaluation of internal 13 control and tests for compliance with laws and regulations 14 shall be performed. As part of conducting an audit of a 15 governmental subdivision, an examination of the governmental 16 subdivisionâs compliance with the reporting requirements of 17 section 331.403, subsection 3 , or section 384.22, subsection 2 , 18 if applicable, shall be performed. As part of conducting an 19 audit of a governmental subdivision for fiscal years beginning 20 on or after July 1, 2027, an examination of the governmental 21 subdivisionâs compliance with section 24.35 shall be performed, 22 including verification of the circumstances resulting in actual 23 reserve funds exceeding the specified limits. 24 Sec. 2. Section 24.34, Code 2026, is amended to read as 25 follows: 26 24.34 Unliquidated obligations. 27 A city, county, or other political subdivision governmental 28 entity, as defined in section 24.35, may establish an 29 encumbrance system for any obligation not liquidated at the 30 close of the fiscal year in which the obligation has been 31 encumbered assigned, committed, restricted, or specified as 32 nonspendable . The encumbered obligations may be retained upon 33 the books of the city, county, or other political subdivision 34 until liquidated, all in accordance with generally accepted 35 -1- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 1/ 57 H.F. 2745 governmental accounting practices principles, as established by 1 the governmental accounting standards board . 2 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 24.35 General fund reserves ââ 3 limitations. 4 1. For purposes of this section: 5 a. âBudget yearâ is the fiscal year beginning during the 6 calendar year in which a budget is certified. 7 b. âCurrent fiscal yearâ is the fiscal year ending during 8 the calendar year in which a budget for the budget year is 9 certified. 10 c. âGeneral fundâ means a governmental entityâs fund 11 designated as such by law or the governmental entityâs fund 12 from which primary general operations of the governmental 13 entity are funded. 14 d. âGovernmental entityâ means any unit of government 15 or other public body or public corporation, including any 16 intergovernmental entity, that has the power to impose or 17 certify a property tax levy. âGovernmental entityâ does not 18 include a school district. 19 e. âUnassignedâ means funds that are not restricted, 20 committed, assigned, or nonspendable within the meaning of 21 generally accepted accounting principles, as established by the 22 governmental accounting standards board. 23 2. a. For budgets certified for budget years beginning 24 on or after July 1, 2027, proposed unassigned reserve funds 25 identified within a governmental entityâs general fund shall 26 not exceed an amount equal to thirty-five percent of the 27 budgeted expenditures from the governmental entityâs general 28 fund for the current fiscal year prior to budgeted transfers 29 from such general fund. 30 b. If the governmental entityâs budget does not comply with 31 the requirements of paragraph âaâ , the department of management 32 shall not certify the governmental entityâs taxes back to the 33 county auditor under section 24.17 and the governmental entity 34 shall remedy the violation and recertify the budget. 35 -2- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 2/ 57 H.F. 2745 3. To ensure uniformity, accuracy, and efficiency in the 1 certification of governmental entity budgets according to the 2 requirements of this section, the department of management 3 shall prescribe the procedures to be used and instruct the 4 appropriate officials of the various governmental entities on 5 implementation of the procedures. 6 Sec. 4. Section 24.48, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 7 following new subsection: 8 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. The authority to suspend property tax 9 levy limitations under this section shall not apply to the 10 limitations of section 444.25. 11 Sec. 5. Section 176A.8, subsection 13, Code 2026, is amended 12 by striking the subsection. 13 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 444.25 Maximum property tax levy 14 dollars. 15 1. For purposes of this section, unless the context 16 otherwise requires: 17 a. âBudget yearâ is the fiscal year beginning during the 18 calendar year in which a budget is certified. 19 b. âCurrent fiscal yearâ is the fiscal year ending during 20 the calendar year in which a budget for the budget year is 21 certified. 22 c. âGovernmental entityâ means any unit of government 23 or other public body or public corporation, including any 24 intergovernmental entity or special purpose district, that 25 has the power to impose or certify a property tax levy. 26 âGovernmental entityâ does not include a school district. 27 d. âNew valuationâ means the increase from the current 28 fiscal year to the budget year in taxable valuation, as shown 29 on the assessment roll due to the following, the amount of each 30 as reported under section 331.510 by the county auditor to the 31 department of management: 32 (1) New construction. 33 (2) Additions or improvements to existing structures that 34 are not normal and necessary repairs under section 441.21, 35 -3- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 3/ 57 H.F. 2745 subsection 8. 1 (3) Net boundary adjustments, including annexation, 2 severance, incorporation, consolidation, or discontinuance as 3 those terms are defined in section 368.1. 4 (4) Valuation exempt from property tax for the current 5 fiscal year as the result of prior new construction, additions, 6 or improvements under section 15.332, Code 2025, section 7 15.500, chapter 404, or chapter 427B, subchapter I, but which 8 is not exempt from property tax in the budget year. 9 e. âProperty tax levyâ means each ad valorem property tax 10 authorized by law to be imposed by a governmental entity, but 11 excluding any levy the revenue from which is specified by law 12 for debt service or required to be used exclusively for the 13 repayment of bonds or other indebtedness. 14 2. a. For the budget year beginning July 1, 2027, and 15 each budget year thereafter, the maximum aggregate amount of 16 property tax dollars that may be certified for levy among all 17 property tax levies imposed by a governmental entity against 18 property that is not new valuation shall not exceed an amount 19 equal to the sum of one hundred two percent of the aggregate 20 amount of property tax dollars certified for levy by the 21 governmental entity among all property tax levies imposed by 22 the governmental entity for the current fiscal year. 23 b. If the budget year includes a voter-approved property tax 24 levy that was not approved for imposition in the current fiscal 25 year, the maximum aggregate amount of property tax dollars for 26 the governmental entity under paragraph âaâ for the budget 27 year shall be increased by the amount of the voter-approved 28 property tax levy approved at election for the budget year. If 29 the current fiscal year includes a voter-approved property tax 30 levy that is not approved for imposition in the budget year, 31 the maximum aggregate amount of property tax dollars for the 32 governmental entity under paragraph âaâ for the budget year 33 shall be reduced by the amount of the voter-approved property 34 tax levy for the current fiscal year. 35 -4- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 4/ 57 H.F. 2745 c. The amount of property tax dollars calculated under this 1 section includes those amounts budgeted by the governmental 2 entity as replacement taxes under chapter 437A or 437B, if 3 applicable. 4 3. For purposes of this section, if the governmental 5 entityâs taxes for a property tax levy were not certified 6 back by the department of management under section 24.17 for 7 the current fiscal year due to an act or omission of the 8 governmental entity, the current fiscal yearâs property tax 9 dollars certified for levy for that property tax levy shall 10 be equal to the amount certified for levy for the fiscal year 11 immediately preceding the current fiscal year. 12 4. If a governmental entity certifies a budget that violates 13 this section, the department of management shall reduce each of 14 the applicable governmental entityâs property tax levies on a 15 pro rata basis so that the governmental entity is in compliance 16 with this section. 17 5. This section shall not be construed as removing or 18 otherwise affecting the property tax limitations, including 19 levy rate and use limitations, otherwise provided by law for 20 any property tax levy of the governmental entity. 21 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 444.26 Use of bonds and indebtedness 22 for general operations ââ prohibition. 23 1. For purposes of this section: 24 a. âGeneral operationsâ means services or activities 25 generally funded from the governmental entityâs general fund, 26 which are necessary for the operation of the governmental 27 entity, including salaries and benefits, or which are for the 28 health and welfare of the governmental entityâs citizens or 29 primarily intended to benefit all residents of the governmental 30 entity, but excluding services financed by statutory funds 31 other than a debt service fund. 32 b. âGovernmental entityâ means any unit of government 33 or other public body or public corporation, including any 34 intergovernmental entity, that has the power to impose or 35 -5- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 5/ 57 H.F. 2745 certify a property tax levy. 1 2. On or after July 1, 2026, the governing body of a 2 governmental entity shall not issue bonds or other indebtedness 3 payable from an ad valorem property tax levy for the purpose of 4 funding the general operations of the governmental entity or 5 otherwise use proceeds from the sale of bonds or issuance of 6 other indebtedness to fund general operations. 7 3. The department of management, following consultation 8 with the city finance committee and the county finance 9 committee, may adopt rules under chapter 17A for governmental 10 entities to implement this section. 11 DIVISION II 12 COMMERCIAL AND INDUSTRIAL PROPERTY ASSESSMENT LIMITATIONS 13 Sec. 8. Section 441.21, subsection 5, paragraph b, 14 subparagraph (2), subparagraph divisions (a) and (b), Code 15 2026, are amended to read as follows: 16 (a) An amount equal to the product of the assessment 17 limitation percentage applicable to residential property under 18 subsection 4 for that assessment year multiplied by the actual 19 value of the property that exceeds zero dollars but does not 20 exceed one three hundred fifty thousand dollars. 21 (b) An amount equal to ninety percent of the actual value of 22 the property for that assessment year that exceeds one three 23 hundred fifty thousand dollars. 24 Sec. 9. Section 441.21, subsection 5, paragraph c, 25 subparagraph (2), subparagraph divisions (a) and (b), Code 26 2026, are amended to read as follows: 27 (a) An amount equal to the product of the assessment 28 limitation percentage applicable to residential property under 29 subsection 4 for that assessment year multiplied by the actual 30 value of the property that exceeds zero dollars but does not 31 exceed one three hundred fifty thousand dollars. 32 (b) An amount equal to ninety percent of the actual value of 33 the property for that assessment year that exceeds one three 34 hundred fifty thousand dollars. 35 -6- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 6/ 57 H.F. 2745 Sec. 10. Section 441.21, subsection 5, paragraph e, 1 subparagraphs (1), (2), and (3), Code 2026, are amended to read 2 as follows: 3 (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2023, there 4 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 5 department of revenue the sum of one hundred twenty-two million 6 three hundred fifty thousand dollars to be used for payments 7 under this paragraph calculated as a result of the assessment 8 limitations imposed under paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2), 9 subparagraph division (a), and paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (2), 10 subparagraph division (a). For each fiscal year beginning 11 on or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2027, there 12 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 13 department of revenue the sum of one hundred twenty-five 14 million dollars to be used for payments under this paragraph 15 calculated as a result of the assessment limitations imposed 16 under paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph division 17 (a), and paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph division 18 (a). 19 (2) For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2023, but 20 before July 1, 2027, each county treasurer shall be paid by the 21 department of revenue an amount calculated under subparagraph 22 (4) for the applicable fiscal year . If an amount appropriated 23 for the fiscal year is insufficient to make all payments as 24 calculated under subparagraph (4), the director of revenue 25 shall prorate the payments to the county treasurers and shall 26 notify the county auditors of the pro rata percentage on or 27 before September 30. 28 (3) On or before July 1 of each applicable fiscal year, the 29 assessor shall report to the county auditor that portion of the 30 total actual value of all commercial property and industrial 31 property in the county that is subject to the assessment 32 limitations imposed under paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2), 33 subparagraph division (a), and paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (2), 34 subparagraph division (a), for the assessment year used to 35 -7- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 7/ 57 H.F. 2745 calculate the taxes due and payable in that fiscal year. 1 Sec. 11. Section 441.21, subsection 5, paragraph e, 2 subparagraph (4), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 On or before September 1 of each applicable fiscal year, the 5 county auditor shall prepare a statement, based on the report 6 received in subparagraph (3) and information transmitted to 7 the county auditor under chapter 434 , listing for each taxing 8 district in the county: 9 Sec. 12. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. The following apply 10 retroactively to assessment years beginning on or after January 11 1, 2026: 12 1. The section of this division of this Act amending 13 section 441.21, subsection 5, paragraph âbâ, subparagraph (2), 14 subparagraph divisions (a) and (b). 15 2. The section of this division of this Act amending 16 section 441.21, subsection 5, paragraph âcâ, subparagraph (2), 17 subparagraph divisions (a) and (b). 18 DIVISION III 19 HOMESTEAD PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION 20 Sec. 13. Section 427.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 21 following new subsection: 22 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. Residential homestead property. 23 a. For assessment years beginning on or after January 1, 24 2026, an exemption from taxation shall be allowed on each 25 property classified as residential property as defined in 26 section 441.21, subsection 14, that is a homestead receiving 27 the homestead credit under chapter 425, subchapter I, for the 28 assessment year. The exemption under this subsection shall be 29 in addition to any exemption or credit for such property under 30 any other provision of law, if applicable. The exemption from 31 taxation under this subsection shall be ten percent of the 32 taxable value of the property or twenty-five thousand dollars 33 in taxable value, whichever is less. However, the exemption 34 under this subsection shall not apply to a property tax imposed 35 -8- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 8/ 57 H.F. 2745 by a school district. 1 b. Section 25B.7, subsection 1, shall not apply to the 2 property tax exemption provided in this subsection. 3 Sec. 14. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 4 Act applies retroactively to assessment years beginning on or 5 after January 1, 2026. 6 DIVISION IV 7 SECURE AN ADVANCED VISION FOR EDUCATION FUND ââ EQUITY TRANSFER 8 PERCENTAGE ââ FUTURE REPEAL 9 Sec. 15. Section 423.2, subsection 12, Code 2026, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 12. The sales tax rate of six percent is reduced to five 12 percent on January 1, 2051 2071 . 13 Sec. 16. Section 423.2A, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 14 2026, is amended to read as follows: 15 c. Transfer one-sixth of the remaining revenues to the 16 secure an advanced vision for education fund created in section 17 423F.2 . This paragraph âcâ is repealed January 1, 2051 2071 . 18 Sec. 17. Section 423.5, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 4. The use tax rate of six percent is reduced to five 21 percent on January 1, 2051 2071 . 22 Sec. 18. Section 423.43, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 23 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 b. Subsequent to the deposit into the general fund of 25 the state and after the transfer of such revenues collected 26 under chapter 423B , the department shall transfer one-sixth of 27 such remaining revenues to the secure an advanced vision for 28 education fund created in section 423F.2 . This paragraph is 29 repealed January 1, 2051 2071 . 30 Sec. 19. Section 423F.2, subsection 3, paragraph b, 31 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (b), Code 2026, is 32 amended to read as follows: 33 (b) For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 34 2020, but before July 1, 2026, the equity transfer percentage 35 -9- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 9/ 57 H.F. 2745 is equal to the equity transfer percentage for the immediately 1 preceding fiscal year, unless the amount of moneys available 2 in the secure an advanced vision for education fund in the 3 immediately preceding fiscal year equals or exceeds one hundred 4 two percent of the amount of moneys available in the fund for 5 the fiscal year prior to the immediately preceding fiscal year, 6 in which case the equity transfer percentage shall be the 7 equity transfer percentage for the immediately preceding fiscal 8 year plus one percent subject to the limitation in subparagraph 9 division (c). 10 Sec. 20. Section 423F.2, subsection 3, paragraph b, 11 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (c), Code 2026, is 12 amended by striking the subparagraph division and inserting in 13 lieu thereof the following: 14 (c) (i) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, the 15 equity transfer percentage is ten percent. 16 (ii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, the equity 17 transfer percentage is twelve and one-half percent. 18 (iii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2028, the equity 19 transfer percentage is fifteen percent. 20 (iv) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2029, the equity 21 transfer percentage is seventeen and one-half percent. 22 (v) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2030, the equity 23 transfer percentage is twenty percent. 24 (vi) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2031, the equity 25 transfer percentage is twenty-two and one-half percent. 26 (vii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2032, the equity 27 transfer percentage is twenty-five percent. 28 (viii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2033, the 29 equity transfer percentage is twenty-seven and one-half 30 percent. 31 (ix) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2034, and each 32 fiscal year thereafter, the equity transfer percentage is 33 thirty percent. 34 Sec. 21. Section 423F.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as 35 -10- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 10/ 57 H.F. 2745 follows: 1 423F.6 Repeal. 2 This chapter is repealed January 1, 2051 2071 . 3 Sec. 22. SCHOOL DISTRICT FUNDING RECONCILIATION. 4 For amounts allocated under section 423F.2 for fiscal 5 years beginning on or after July 1, 2026, the department of 6 management shall adjust or reconcile actual amounts to be 7 received by school districts in the fiscal year immediately 8 following the fiscal year during which the revenues were 9 collected. 10 DIVISION V 11 PROPERTY PARCEL INFORMATION 12 Sec. 23. Section 331.510, Code 2026, is amended by adding 13 the following new subsection: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. a. An annual report not later 15 than January 1 to the department of management containing 16 parcel-level property data, including parcel identification 17 information, location, size, valuation, classification, types 18 of structures and improvements, exemptions, credits, historical 19 amounts of property taxes due and payable, and whether the 20 parcel is subject to a division of revenue. 21 b. In addition to the information required under paragraph 22 âaâ , the department of management may require additional 23 parcel-level data deemed necessary by the director of the 24 department of management. The department shall prescribe the 25 form and manner of submitting the annual report under this 26 subsection. 27 DIVISION VI 28 URBAN RENEWAL 29 Sec. 24. Section 15A.1, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 30 2026, is amended to read as follows: 31 b. For purposes of this chapter , âeconomic developmentâ 32 means private or joint public and private investment involving 33 the creation of new jobs and income or the retention of 34 existing jobs and income that would otherwise be lost or the 35 -11- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 11/ 57 H.F. 2745 provision of workforce housing . 1 Sec. 25. Section 15A.1, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 2 by adding the following new paragraph: 3 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. Development policies that advance the 4 development of workforce housing. 5 Sec. 26. Section 403.17, subsection 14, Code 2026, is 6 amended to read as follows: 7 14. âLow or and moderate income familiesâ means those 8 families, including single person households, earning no 9 more than eighty percent of the higher of the median family 10 income of the county or the statewide nonmetropolitan area as 11 determined by the latest United States department of housing 12 and urban development, section 8 income guidelines. 13 Sec. 27. Section 403.17, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 14 following new subsection: 15 NEW SUBSECTION . 14A. âLow and moderate income family 16 housingâ means housing for low and moderate income families and 17 includes housing that meets the requirements of section 15.353. 18 Sec. 28. Section 403.19, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 19 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 a. That portion of the taxes each year in excess of such 21 amount shall be allocated to and when collected be paid into 22 a special fund of the municipality to pay the principal of 23 and interest on loans, moneys advanced to, or indebtedness, 24 whether funded, refunded, assumed, or otherwise, including 25 bonds issued under the authority of section 403.9, subsection 26 1 , incurred by the municipality to finance or refinance, in 27 whole or in part, an urban renewal project within the area, 28 and to provide assistance for low and moderate income family 29 housing as provided in section 403.22 . However, except 30 as provided in paragraph âbâ , taxes for the regular and 31 voter-approved physical plant and equipment levy of a school 32 district imposed pursuant to section 298.2 ; and taxes for the 33 instructional support program of a school district imposed 34 pursuant to section 257.19 , ; taxes for the payment of bonds 35 -12- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 12/ 57 H.F. 2745 and interest of each taxing district , ; foundation property 1 taxes of a school district imposed under section 257.3 levied 2 against property located in an incorporated area upon which new 3 construction or renovations begin on or after the effective 4 date of this division of this Act, unless such construction or 5 renovations were approved and subject to an agreement adopted 6 before January 1, 2026; taxes for emergency medical services 7 imposed pursuant to chapters 357F, 357G, or 422D; and taxes 8 imposed under section 346.27, subsection 22 , related to joint 9 county-city buildings shall be collected against all taxable 10 property within the taxing district without limitation by the 11 provisions of this subsection . 12 Sec. 29. Section 403.19, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 13 by adding the following new paragraph: 14 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. For urban renewal areas for which an 15 ordinance providing for a division of revenue is not limited 16 in duration under section 403.17, subsection 10, or section 17 403.22, subsection 5, after twenty years following the 18 effective date of this division of this Act or after twenty 19 years from the calendar year following the calendar year in 20 which the municipality first certifies to the county auditor 21 the amount of any loans, advances, indebtedness, or bonds which 22 qualify for payment from the division of revenue, whichever 23 is later, the amount determined under paragraph âaâ that 24 may be paid into the municipalityâs special fund shall not 25 exceed sixty percent of the amount otherwise determined under 26 paragraph âaâ but for this paragraph and such excess amounts 27 shall be allocated and paid to the respective taxing districts 28 in the same manner as amounts under subsection 1. The 29 municipality may exceed the limitation in this paragraph to the 30 extent necessary for payments of bonds or other indebtedness 31 incurred before the effective date of this division of this 32 Act. This paragraph shall not apply to divisions of revenue 33 established by community colleges under chapter 260E or rural 34 improvement zones under chapter 357H. 35 -13- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 13/ 57 H.F. 2745 Sec. 30. Section 403.19, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. Unless otherwise limited in duration 3 under section 403.17, subsection 10, an ordinance providing 4 for a division of revenue under this section that is adopted 5 on or after the effective date of this division of this Act 6 shall be limited to twenty-three years from the calendar year 7 following the calendar year in which the municipality first 8 certifies to the county auditor the amount of any loans, 9 advances, indebtedness, or bonds that qualify for payment 10 from the division of revenue provided for in this section. 11 The ordinance shall terminate and be of no further force and 12 effect following the twenty-three-year period provided in this 13 subsection. This subsection shall not apply to divisions of 14 revenue established by community colleges under chapter 260E or 15 rural improvement zones under chapter 357H. 16 Sec. 31. Section 403.22, subsection 1, paragraphs a, b, and 17 c, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 18 a. For a municipality with a population over fifteen five 19 thousand, the amount to be provided for low and moderate income 20 family housing for such projects shall be either equal to 21 or greater than the percentage of the original project cost 22 that is equal to the percentage of low and moderate income 23 residents for the county in which the urban renewal area is 24 located as determined by the United States department of 25 housing and urban development using section 8 guidelines or 26 by providing such other amount as set out in a plan adopted 27 by the municipality and approved by the economic development 28 authority if the municipality can show that it cannot undertake 29 the project if it has to meet the low and moderate income 30 assistance requirements . However, the amount provided for low 31 and moderate income family housing for such projects shall not 32 be less than an amount equal to ten percent of the original 33 project cost required to exceed the lesser of twenty percent 34 of the original project cost or three hundred fifty thousand 35 -14- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 14/ 57 H.F. 2745 dollars if the municipality is a city or three hundred thousand 1 dollars if the municipality is a county . 2 b. For a municipality with a population of fifteen thousand 3 or less, the amount to be provided for low and moderate income 4 family housing shall be the same as for a municipality of over 5 fifteen thousand in population, except that a municipality 6 of fifteen thousand or less in population is not subject to 7 the requirement to provide not less than an amount equal to 8 ten percent of the original project cost for low and moderate 9 income family housing. 10 c. b. For a municipality with a population of five thousand 11 or less, the municipality need not provide any low and moderate 12 income family housing assistance if the municipality has 13 completed a housing needs assessment meeting the standards set 14 out by the economic development authority, which shows no low 15 and moderate income housing need, and the economic development 16 authority agrees that no low and moderate income family housing 17 assistance is needed . 18 Sec. 32. Section 403.22, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 19 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 a. Except For ordinances providing for a division of 21 revenue adopted before the effective date of this division of 22 this Act, except for a municipality with a population under 23 fifteen thousand, the division of the revenue under section 24 403.19 for each project under this section shall be limited 25 to tax collections for ten fiscal years beginning with the 26 second fiscal year after the year in which the municipality 27 first certifies to the county auditor the amount of any loans, 28 advances, indebtedness, or bonds which qualify for payment from 29 the division of the revenue in connection with the project. 30 Sec. 33. Section 403.22, subsection 5, paragraph d, Code 31 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 32 Sec. 34. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 33 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 34 Sec. 35. APPLICABILITY. The following applies to property 35 -15- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 15/ 57 H.F. 2745 taxes due and payable in fiscal years beginning on or after 1 July 1, 2027: 2 The section of this division of this Act amending section 3 403.19, subsection 2, paragraph âaâ. 4 Sec. 36. APPLICABILITY. The following apply to urban 5 renewal areas in existence on or established on or after the 6 effective date of this division of this Act: 7 1. The section of this division of this Act amending section 8 403.22, subsection 1, paragraphs âaâ, âbâ, and âcâ. 9 2. The section of this division of this Act amending section 10 403.22, subsection 5, paragraph âdâ. 11 DIVISION VII 12 ASSESSMENT PROCEDURES 13 Sec. 37. Section 441.21, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 14 to read as follows: 15 3. a. âActual valueâ , âtaxable valueâ , or âassessed 16 valueâ as used in other sections of the Code in relation to 17 assessment of property for taxation shall mean the valuations 18 as determined by this section ; however, other provisions of 19 the Code providing special methods or formulas for assessing 20 or valuing specified property shall remain in effect, but this 21 section shall be applicable to the extent consistent with such 22 provisions. The assessor and department of revenue shall 23 disclose at the written request of the taxpayer all information 24 in any formula or method used to determine the actual value of 25 the taxpayerâs property. In addition, for assessment years 26 beginning on or after January 1, 2027, if the taxpayerâs 27 property has increased in actual value by ten percent or more 28 from the immediately preceding assessment year, the assessor 29 shall provide the taxpayer with a statement of the reasons 30 for the increase in actual value, information specifying the 31 portion of actual value increase attributable to a change in 32 classification, revaluation, new construction, improvements, or 33 renovations to the property, and all information in any formula 34 or method used to determine the actual value. 35 -16- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 16/ 57 H.F. 2745 b. (1) For assessment years beginning before January 1 1, 2018, the burden of proof shall be upon any complainant 2 attacking such valuation as excessive, inadequate, inequitable, 3 or capricious. However, in protest or appeal proceedings when 4 the complainant offers competent evidence by at least two 5 disinterested witnesses that the market value of the property 6 is less than the market value determined by the assessor, the 7 burden of proof thereafter shall be upon the officials or 8 persons seeking to uphold such valuation to be assessed. 9 (2) (1) For assessment years beginning on or after January 10 1, 2018, the Except as provided in subparagraph (3), the burden 11 of proof shall be upon any complainant attacking such valuation 12 as excessive, inadequate, inequitable, or capricious. However, 13 in protest or appeal proceedings when the complainant offers 14 competent evidence that the market value of the property is 15 different than the market value determined by the assessor, 16 the burden of proof thereafter shall be upon the officials or 17 persons seeking to uphold such valuation to be assessed. 18 (3) (2) If the classification of a property has been 19 previously adjudicated by the property assessment appeal board 20 or a court as part of an appeal under this chapter , there 21 is a presumption that the classification of the property has 22 not changed for each of the four subsequent assessment years, 23 unless a subsequent such adjudication of the classification of 24 the property has occurred, and the burden of demonstrating a 25 change in use shall be upon the person asserting a change to 26 the propertyâs classification. 27 (3) For assessment years beginning on or after January 1, 28 2027, if the taxpayerâs property actual value increased by ten 29 percent or more from the immediately preceding assessment year, 30 including an increase as the result of an equalization order, 31 and the property did not change classification or primary use 32 and the increase in actual value is not the result of new 33 construction, improvements, or renovations to the property, the 34 actual value so determined by the assessor is not presumed to 35 -17- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 17/ 57 H.F. 2745 be the actual value and in any protest or appeal the assessor 1 shall have the burden of proof that the valuation is not 2 excessive, inadequate, inequitable, or capricious. 3 Sec. 38. Section 441.33, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 4 following new subsection: 5 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Ex parte communications with board of 6 review members are prohibited in protests before the board. 7 DIVISION VIII 8 LOCAL GOVERNMENT EFFICIENCY GRANT PROGRAM 9 Sec. 39. NEW SECTION . 28E.20 Local government efficiency 10 grant program. 11 1. A local government efficiency grant fund is created 12 and established as a separate and distinct fund in the 13 state treasury under the control of Iowa state university 14 of science and technology. For purposes of this section, 15 âlocal governmentâ means a county, city, township, or any 16 special-purpose district or authority. 17 2. a. There is appropriated from the general fund of 18 the state to the local government efficiency grant fund for 19 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending July 1, 20 2027, ten million dollars. In addition to moneys deposited 21 in the local government efficiency grant fund pursuant to 22 appropriations made by the general assembly, Iowa state 23 university of science and technology or the commission 24 established under paragraph âcâ may accept gifts, grants, 25 bequests, and other private contributions, as well as state 26 or federal funds, and shall deposit the moneys in the fund 27 to be used for purposes of this section. Moneys in the fund 28 are appropriated to the Iowa state university of science and 29 technology and shall be used only, after commission approval, 30 to provide grants to local governments to assist in efforts 31 to increase government efficiency, including but not limited 32 to efforts to consolidate government positions and pursue 33 agreements with other local governments to share services 34 and reduce the use of property tax revenues for such shared 35 -18- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 18/ 57 H.F. 2745 services. Grant funds may be used by the local government 1 for costs to implement efficiency initiatives including 2 but not limited to service-sharing or service-consolidation 3 initiatives and transitional or temporary costs of eliminating 4 services, and to the extent necessary shall be coordinated with 5 Iowa cooperative extension service in agriculture and home 6 economics of Iowa state university of science and technology 7 and extension districts under chapter 176A. 8 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund 9 that remain unawarded at the close of the fiscal year shall 10 not revert but shall remain in the fund for expenditure in 11 succeeding fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, 12 subsection 2, interest earned on moneys in the local government 13 efficiency grant fund shall be credited to the fund. 14 c. A local government efficiency commission shall be 15 established at Iowa state university of science and technology 16 comprised of not more than ten individuals appointed by the 17 president of the university who have experience in local 18 government operations and budgeting, local government planning, 19 and cooperative extension services. The local government 20 efficiency commission shall review and approve or deny each 21 grant application. 22 3. The local government efficiency commission shall 23 establish and administer the grant program to provide for the 24 allocation of moneys in the fund in the form of competitive 25 grants to local governments in accordance with the purposes and 26 objectives of this section. The rules for the program adopted 27 by the commission shall specify the eligibility of applicants, 28 eligible services and items for grant funding, the electronic 29 application process, and the maximum award per grant. 30 DIVISION IX 31 FIRSTHOME IOWA ACCOUNTS 32 Sec. 40. Section 12G.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 33 following new subsection: 34 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. Create strategies for coordination of 35 -19- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 19/ 57 H.F. 2745 the program with the FirstHome Iowa program trust established 1 in chapter 12L. 2 Sec. 41. NEW SECTION . 12L.1 FirstHome Iowa program ââ 3 purpose and definitions. 4 1. The general assembly finds that the general welfare and 5 well-being of the state are directly related to homeownership 6 of the citizens of the state, and that a vital and valid 7 public purpose is served by the creation and implementation 8 of programs which encourage and make possible the attainment 9 of homeownership by the greatest number of citizens of the 10 state. The general welfare of the citizens of the state will 11 be enhanced by establishing a FirstHome Iowa program which 12 allows citizens of the state to invest money in a public trust 13 for future application to the payment of qualified homebuyer 14 expenses. The creation of the means of encouragement for 15 citizens to invest in such a program represents the carrying 16 out of a vital and valid public purpose. In order to make 17 available to the citizens of the state an opportunity to fund 18 future first-time homeownership, it is necessary that a public 19 trust be established in which moneys may be invested for future 20 use. 21 2. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 22 requires: 23 a. âAdministrative fundâ means the administrative fund 24 established under section 12L.4. 25 b. âBeneficiaryâ means the individual designated by a 26 participation agreement to benefit from advance payments of 27 qualified homebuyer expenses on behalf of the beneficiary. 28 c. âFirst-time homebuyerâ means an individual who is a 29 resident of Iowa and who does not own, either individually or 30 jointly, a single-family or multifamily residence, and who 31 has not owned or purchased, either individually or jointly, a 32 single-family or multifamily residence for a period of three 33 years prior to the date of the qualified purchase for which the 34 eligible home costs are paid or reimbursed from an account. 35 -20- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 20/ 57 H.F. 2745 d. âFirstHome Iowa program trustâ or âtrustâ means the trust 1 created under section 12L.2. 2 e. âFirstHome Iowa program trust accountâ or âaccountâ 3 means an account within the trust that was established for 4 the purpose of paying or reimbursing a beneficiaryâs eligible 5 qualified homebuyer expenses in connection with a qualified 6 purchase. 7 f. âIndividualâ means a natural person. 8 g. âParticipantâ means an individual, individualâs legal 9 representative, trust, or estate that has entered into a 10 participation agreement under this chapter, either individually 11 or jointly with the individualâs spouse, for the advance 12 payment of qualified homebuyer expenses on behalf of a 13 beneficiary. 14 h. âParticipation agreementâ means an agreement between a 15 participant and the trust entered into under this chapter. 16 i. âProgram fundâ means the program fund established under 17 section 12L.4. 18 j. âQualified homebuyer expensesâ means any of the 19 following: 20 (1) A down payment or closing costs for the qualified 21 purchase of a single-family residence in Iowa that is the 22 principal residence of the beneficiary if such beneficiary is a 23 first-time homebuyer with respect to such purchase. 24 (2) A cost, fee, tax, or payment incurred by, or charged 25 or assigned to, a beneficiary as part of the purchase under 26 subparagraph (1) and listed on the statement of receipts and 27 disbursements for the sale, including any statement prescribed 28 by 12 C.F.R. Â§1026.38, as amended. 29 (3) Any United States veterans administration funding 30 fee incurred by, or charged or assigned to, a beneficiary in 31 connection with a veterans administration home loan guaranty 32 program. 33 k. âQualified purchaseâ means the purchase of a 34 single-family residence in Iowa by the accountâs beneficiary 35 -21- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 21/ 57 H.F. 2745 ninety or more days after the date the participant first opened 1 the account. 2 l. âResidentâ means the same as defined in section 422.4. 3 m. âSingle-family residenceâ means a single-family 4 residence owned and occupied by a beneficiary as the 5 beneficiaryâs principal residence, including but not limited 6 to a manufactured home, mobile home, condominium unit, or 7 cooperative. 8 Sec. 42. NEW SECTION . 12L.2 Creation of FirstHome Iowa 9 program trust. 10 A FirstHome Iowa program trust is created. The treasurer of 11 state is the trustee of the trust, and has all powers necessary 12 to carry out and effectuate the purposes, objectives, and 13 provisions of this chapter pertaining to the trust, including 14 the power to do all of the following: 15 1. Make and enter into contracts necessary for the 16 administration of the trust created under this chapter. 17 2. Enter into agreements with any financial institution, 18 the state, or any federal or other state agency, or other 19 entity as required to implement this chapter. 20 3. Carry out the duties and obligations of the trust 21 pursuant to this chapter. 22 4. Accept any grants, gifts, legislative appropriations, 23 and other moneys from the state, any unit of federal, state, or 24 local government, or any other person, firm, partnership, or 25 corporation which the treasurer of state shall deposit into the 26 administrative fund or the program fund. 27 5. Carry out studies and projections so the treasurer of 28 state may advise participants regarding present and estimated 29 future qualified homebuyer expenses and levels of financial 30 participation in the trust required in order to enable 31 participants to achieve their qualifying purchase objectives. 32 6. Participate in any federal, state, or local governmental 33 program for the benefit of the trust. 34 7. Procure insurance against any loss in connection with the 35 -22- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 22/ 57 H.F. 2745 property, assets, or activities of the trust. 1 8. Enter into participation agreements with participants. 2 9. Make payments to or on behalf of beneficiaries for 3 qualified homebuyer expenses pursuant to participation 4 agreements. 5 10. Make refunds to participants upon the termination 6 of participation agreements, and partial nonqualified 7 distributions to participants, pursuant to the provisions, 8 limitations, and restrictions set forth in this chapter. 9 11. Invest moneys from the program fund in any investments 10 which are determined by the treasurer of state to be 11 appropriate. 12 12. Engage investment advisors, if necessary, to assist in 13 the investment of trust assets. 14 13. Contract for goods and services and engage personnel 15 as necessary, including consultants, actuaries, managers, 16 legal counsel, and auditors for the purpose of rendering 17 professional, managerial, and technical assistance and advice 18 to the treasurer of state regarding trust administration and 19 operation. 20 14. Establish, impose, and collect administrative fees 21 and charges in connection with transactions of the trust for 22 deposit in the administrative fund and provide for reasonable 23 service charges. 24 15. Administer the funds of the trust. 25 16. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A for the 26 administration of the trust. 27 Sec. 43. NEW SECTION . 12L.3 Participation agreements for 28 trust. 29 The trust may enter into participation agreements with 30 participants on behalf of beneficiaries pursuant to the 31 following terms and agreements: 32 1. Each participation agreement may require a participant 33 to agree to invest a specific amount of money in the trust 34 for a specific period of time for the benefit of a specific 35 -23- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 23/ 57 H.F. 2745 beneficiary. A participant shall not be required to make an 1 annual contribution on behalf of a beneficiary. The maximum 2 contribution that may be deducted for Iowa income tax purposes 3 shall be the amount contributed by the participant during the 4 applicable tax year, not to exceed five thousand five hundred 5 dollars per beneficiary per year adjusted annually to reflect 6 increases in the consumer price index. 7 2. The execution of a participation agreement by the 8 trust shall not guarantee in any way that qualified homebuyer 9 expenses will be equal to projections and estimates provided by 10 the trust or that the beneficiary named in any participation 11 agreement will qualify for a mortgage, home loan, or other 12 forms of credit for a qualified purchase. 13 3. a. A beneficiary under a participation agreement may be 14 changed as permitted under rules adopted by the treasurer of 15 state upon written request of the participant as long as the 16 substitute beneficiary is eligible for participation. 17 b. Participation agreements may otherwise be freely amended 18 throughout their terms in order to enable participants to 19 increase or decrease the level of participation, change the 20 designation of beneficiaries, and carry out similar matters as 21 authorized by rule. 22 4. Each participation agreement shall provide that the 23 participation agreement may be canceled upon the terms and 24 conditions, and upon payment of applicable fees and costs set 25 forth and contained in the rules adopted by the treasurer of 26 state. 27 5. A participant may designate a successor in accordance 28 with rules adopted by the treasurer of state. The designated 29 successor shall succeed to the ownership of the account in 30 the event of the death of the participant. In the event a 31 participant dies and has not designated a successor to the 32 account, the following criteria shall apply: 33 a. The beneficiary of the account, if eighteen years of 34 age or older, shall become the owner of the account as well as 35 -24- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 24/ 57 H.F. 2745 remain the beneficiary upon filing the appropriate forms in 1 accordance with rules adopted by the treasurer of state. 2 b. If the beneficiary of the account is under the age of 3 eighteen, account ownership shall be transferred to the first 4 surviving parent or other legal guardian of the beneficiary to 5 file the appropriate forms in accordance with rules adopted by 6 the treasurer of state. 7 Sec. 44. NEW SECTION . 12L.4 FirstHome Iowa program and 8 administrative funds ââ investment and payments. 9 1. a. The treasurer of state shall segregate moneys 10 received by the trust into two funds: the FirstHome Iowa 11 program fund and the administrative fund to be used for 12 administration of the program. 13 b. All moneys paid by participants in connection with 14 participation agreements shall be deposited as received into 15 separate accounts within the program fund. 16 c. Contributions to the trust made by participants may only 17 be made in the form of cash. 18 d. A participant or beneficiary may, directly or indirectly, 19 direct the investment of any contributions to the trust or any 20 earnings thereon no more than four times in a calendar year. 21 2. Moneys accrued by participants in the program fund of the 22 trust may be used for payments to or on behalf of a beneficiary 23 for qualified homebuyer expenses. 24 Sec. 45. NEW SECTION . 12L.5 Cancellation of agreements. 25 A participant may cancel a participation agreement at will. 26 Upon cancellation of a participation agreement, a participant 27 shall be entitled to the return of the participantâs account 28 balance. 29 Sec. 46. NEW SECTION . 12L.6 Ownership of payments and 30 investment income ââ transfer of ownership rights. 31 1. a. A participant retains ownership of all payments 32 made under a participation agreement up to the date of 33 utilization for payment of qualified homebuyer expenses for the 34 beneficiary. 35 -25- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 25/ 57 H.F. 2745 b. All income derived from the investment of the payments 1 made by the participant shall be considered to be held in trust 2 for the benefit of the beneficiary. 3 2. In the event the FirstHome Iowa program is terminated 4 prior to payment of qualified homebuyer expenses for the 5 beneficiary, the participant is entitled to a refund of the 6 participantâs account balance. 7 3. Any amounts which may be paid to any person or persons 8 pursuant to the FirstHome Iowa program trust but which are not 9 listed in this section are owned by the trust. 10 4. A participant may transfer ownership rights to another 11 participant or may transfer funds to another account under the 12 trust. The transfer shall be made and the property distributed 13 in accordance with rules adopted by the treasurer of state or 14 with the terms of the participation agreement. 15 5. A participant shall not be entitled to utilize any 16 interest in the trust as security for a loan. 17 Sec. 47. NEW SECTION . 12L.7 Annual audited financial report 18 to governor and general assembly. 19 1. a. The treasurer of state shall submit an annual 20 audited financial report, prepared in accordance with generally 21 accepted accounting principles, on the operations of the trust 22 by November 1 to the governor and the general assembly. 23 b. The annual audit shall be made either by the auditor 24 of state or by an independent certified public accountant 25 designated by the auditor of state and shall include direct and 26 indirect costs attributable to the use of outside consultants, 27 independent contractors, and any other persons who are not 28 state employees. 29 2. The annual audit shall be supplemented by all of the 30 following information prepared by the treasurer of state: 31 a. Any related studies or evaluations prepared in the 32 preceding year. 33 b. A summary of the benefits provided by the trust including 34 the number of participants and beneficiaries in the trust. 35 -26- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 26/ 57 H.F. 2745 c. Any other information which is relevant in order to make 1 a full, fair, and effective disclosure of the operations of the 2 trust. 3 Sec. 48. NEW SECTION . 12L.8 Tax considerations. 4 State income tax treatment of the FirstHome Iowa program 5 trust shall be as provided in section 422.7, subsections 46 and 6 47. 7 Sec. 49. NEW SECTION . 12L.9 Property rights to assets in 8 trust. 9 1. The assets of the trust shall at all times be preserved, 10 invested, and expended solely and only for the purposes of 11 the trust and shall be held in trust for the participants and 12 beneficiaries. 13 2. No property rights in the trust shall exist in favor of 14 the state. 15 3. The assets of the trust shall not be transferred or used 16 by the state for any purposes other than the purposes of the 17 trust. 18 Sec. 50. NEW SECTION . 12L.10 Construction. 19 This chapter shall be construed liberally in order to 20 effectuate its purpose. 21 Sec. 51. Section 232D.503, subsection 6, Code 2026, is 22 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 23 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. A FirstHome Iowa program trust account 24 established for the minor pursuant to chapter 12L. 25 Sec. 52. Section 422.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 26 following new subsections: 27 NEW SUBSECTION . 46. a. Subtract the contribution that may 28 be deducted for Iowa income tax purposes as a participant in 29 the FirstHome Iowa program trust pursuant to section 12L.3, 30 subsection 1. For purposes of this paragraph, a participant 31 who makes a contribution on or before the date prescribed in 32 section 422.21 for making and filing an individual income tax 33 return, excluding extensions, or the date for making and filing 34 an individual income tax return determined by the director 35 -27- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 27/ 57 H.F. 2745 pursuant to an order issued under section 421.17, subsection 1 30, may elect to be deemed to have made the contribution on the 2 last day of the preceding calendar year. The director, after 3 consultation with the treasurer of state, shall prescribe by 4 rule the manner and method by which a participant may make an 5 election authorized by the preceding sentence. 6 b. Add the amount resulting from the cancellation of 7 a participation agreement refunded to the taxpayer as a 8 participant in the FirstHome Iowa program trust to the extent 9 previously deducted as a contribution to the trust. 10 c. Add, to the extent previously deducted as a contribution 11 to the trust, the amount resulting from a withdrawal or 12 transfer made by the taxpayer from the FirstHome Iowa program 13 trust for purposes other than the payment of qualified 14 homebuyer expenses. 15 NEW SUBSECTION . 47. Subtract, to the extent included, 16 income from interest and earnings received from the FirstHome 17 Iowa program trust created in chapter 12L. 18 Sec. 53. Section 541B.4, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 19 following new subsections: 20 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. Withdrawal for deposit into FirstHome 21 Iowa program trust account. First-time homebuyer account 22 balances under this chapter may be withdrawn without penalty or 23 taxation in this state if such withdrawal is deposited in an 24 account within the FirstHome Iowa program trust under chapter 25 12L within thirty days of the withdrawal. The treasurer of 26 state may by rule provide for the direct transfer of moneys 27 within an account under this chapter to a FirstHome Iowa 28 program trust account and such transfer shall not be subject to 29 penalty or taxation in this state. 30 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. No new accounts. New accounts shall not 31 be established under this chapter on or after July 1, 2026. 32 Sec. 54. Section 627.6, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 33 following new subsection: 34 NEW SUBSECTION . 18. The debtorâs interest, whether as 35 -28- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 28/ 57 H.F. 2745 participant or beneficiary, in contributions and assets, 1 including the accumulated earnings and market increases in 2 value, held in an account in the FirstHome Iowa program trust 3 organized under chapter 12L. 4 Sec. 55. Section 633.108, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 5 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. A FirstHome Iowa program trust account 7 established for the minor pursuant to chapter 12L. 8 Sec. 56. Section 633.555, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 9 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 10 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. An account owner or participant under 11 a FirstHome Iowa program trust account established for the 12 protected person pursuant to chapter 12L. 13 Sec. 57. Section 633.678, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 14 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 15 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. An account owner or participant under 16 a FirstHome Iowa program trust account established for the 17 protected person pursuant to chapter 12L. 18 Sec. 58. Section 633.681, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 19 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 20 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. An account owner or participant under 21 a FirstHome Iowa program trust account established for the 22 protected person pursuant to chapter 12L. 23 Sec. 59. APPLICABILITY. The following applies to 24 contributions made under chapter 12L on or after July 1, 2026, 25 for tax years ending on or after that date: 26 The section of this division of this Act enacting section 27 422.7, subsections 46 and 47. 28 DIVISION X 29 VALUATIONS ââ ABNORMAL TRANSACTIONS ââ REAL ESTATE TRANSFER TAX 30 FORMS 31 Sec. 60. Section 428A.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 32 follows: 33 428A.7 Forms provided by director of revenue. 34 The director of revenue shall prescribe the form of the 35 -29- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 29/ 57 H.F. 2745 declaration of value and shall include an appropriate place 1 for the inclusion of special facts and circumstances relating 2 to the actual sales price in real estate transfers including 3 but not limited to factors that distort market value such as 4 built-to-suit sales, sale-leaseback sales, leased fee sales, 5 and the abnormal transactions identified in section 441.21, 6 subsection 1, paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (1) . The director 7 shall provide an adequate number of the declaration of value 8 forms to each county recorder in the state. If the declaration 9 of value form requires or provides for the inclusion of the 10 social security number or federal tax identification number of 11 a seller or buyer, the department shall provide that the social 12 security number or federal tax identification number remains 13 confidential and cannot be obtained by public examination. 14 Sec. 61. Section 441.21, subsection 1, paragraph b, 15 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 (1) The actual value of all property subject to assessment 17 and taxation shall be the fair and reasonable market value of 18 such property except as otherwise provided in this section . 19 âMarket valueâ is defined as the fair and reasonable exchange 20 in the year in which the property is listed and valued between 21 a willing buyer and a willing seller, neither being under any 22 compulsion to buy or sell and each being familiar with all 23 the facts relating to the particular property. Sale prices 24 of the property or comparable property in normal transactions 25 reflecting market value, and the probable availability 26 or unavailability of persons interested in purchasing the 27 property, shall be taken into consideration in arriving at 28 its market value. In arriving at market value, sale prices 29 of property in abnormal transactions not reflecting market 30 value shall not be taken into account, or shall be adjusted to 31 eliminate the effect of factors which distort market value, 32 including but not limited to built-to-suit construction, 33 sale-leaseback transactions, leased fee sales, sales to 34 immediate family of the seller between related parties , 35 -30- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 30/ 57 H.F. 2745 foreclosure or other forced sales, contract sales, discounted 1 purchase transactions or purchase of adjoining land or other 2 land to be operated as a unit. 3 Sec. 62. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 4 Act applies retroactively to assessment years beginning on or 5 after January 1, 2026. 6 DIVISION XI 7 LOCAL GOVERNMENT BUDGET STATEMENTS 8 Sec. 63. Section 24.2A, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 9 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 10 Sec. 64. Section 24.2A, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 11 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12 d. âPolitical subdivisionâ means a school district, a 13 county, or a city. In addition, for purposes of the statements 14 required under subsection 2, paragraph âbâ , only, all 15 certifying boards that are not a political subdivision shall be 16 considered a single political subdivision and identified under 17 a designation of special taxing districts on such statements. 18 Sec. 65. Section 24.2A, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 19 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 a. On or before 4:00 p.m. on March 5 of each year, each 21 political subdivision certifying board shall file with the 22 department of management a report containing all necessary 23 information for the department of management to compile and 24 calculate amounts required to be included in the statements 25 mailed under paragraph âbâ or provided under paragraph âcâ . If 26 a county or city certifying board, except a school district, 27 fails to file all necessary information with the department of 28 management by 4:00 p.m. on March 5, taxes levied by the county 29 or city certifying board shall be limited to the prior yearâs 30 budget amount. 31 Sec. 66. Section 24.2A, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 32 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 33 lieu thereof the following: 34 b. Not later than March 15, the county auditor, using 35 -31- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 31/ 57 H.F. 2745 information compiled and calculated by the department of 1 management under paragraph âaâ , shall send to each property 2 owner or taxpayer within the county by regular mail or post 3 under paragraph âcâ a statement, identified as not being a 4 property tax bill and indicating the approximate date when 5 a property tax bill will be delivered, but containing a 6 minimum of all of the following, including the information 7 in subparagraphs (3), (4), (5), (7), and (8) for each of the 8 political subdivisions comprising the ownerâs or taxpayerâs 9 taxing district: 10 (1) The address, property description, parcel 11 identification number, actual value, and taxable value of the 12 ownerâs or taxpayerâs property. 13 (2) The classification of the ownerâs or taxpayerâs 14 property, including identification of all assessment 15 limitations under section 441.21, and identification of each 16 property tax exemption or credit being received by the owner 17 or taxpayer for the property for the assessment year and the 18 immediately preceding assessment year. 19 (3) The sum of the current fiscal yearâs actual property 20 taxes certified for levy for all of the political subdivisionâs 21 levies on the ownerâs or taxpayerâs property, the percentage 22 that such amount represents of the total taxes due on the 23 property, and the allocation of such amounts to specified 24 categories of the political subdivisionâs services and 25 activities. 26 (4) The combined amount of the proposed property tax dollars 27 to be certified for all of the political subdivisionâs levies 28 for the budget year on the ownerâs or taxpayerâs property, 29 the percentage that such amount represents of the proposed 30 total taxes due on the property, the percentage increase of 31 such amount from the current fiscal year and the potential 32 reasons for any increases, and the allocation of such amounts 33 to specified categories of the political subdivisionâs services 34 and activities, including that portion of such amount subject 35 -32- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 32/ 57 H.F. 2745 to the limitation under section 444.25. 1 (5) Tax amounts provided under subparagraphs (3) and (4) 2 as a per month amount and a percentage change in the per month 3 amount between the current fiscal year and the budget year. 4 (6) A comparison of the combined amount of property taxes 5 due on the ownerâs or taxpayerâs property for all political 6 subdivisions for the current fiscal year and the combined 7 proposed amount of property taxes due on the ownerâs or 8 taxpayerâs property for all political subdivisions for the 9 budget year, including the percentage in change in such 10 amounts. 11 (7) The date, time, and location of the political 12 subdivisionâs public hearing under subsection 4, including 13 a statement of the owner or taxpayerâs ability to provide 14 feedback at the public hearing and protest property 15 assessments. 16 (8) Information on how to access on the political 17 subdivisionâs internet site the political subdivisionâs 18 statements under this section and other budget documents for 19 prior fiscal years. 20 (9) A link to the department of managementâs internet site 21 where the property owner or taxpayer may view an example of the 22 statement and a brief explanation of the information included 23 on the statement. 24 Sec. 67. Section 24.2A, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 25 by adding the following new paragraph: 26 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. For budgets for fiscal years beginning 27 on or after July 1, 2027, statements under paragraph âbâ , in 28 lieu of regular mail, may be provided by posting the statement 29 not later than March 15 on the political subdivisionâs 30 internet site for public viewing and shall be maintained on 31 the political subdivisionâs internet site with all such prior 32 year statements. Additionally, if the political subdivision 33 maintains a social media account on one or more social media 34 applications, the statement or an electronic link to the 35 -33- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 33/ 57 H.F. 2745 statement shall be posted on each such account on a date no 1 later than March 15. 2 Sec. 68. Section 24.2A, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 3. The department of management shall prescribe the form 5 for the report required under subsection 2 , paragraph âaâ ; 6 following consultation with the Iowa league of cities and the 7 Iowa state association of counties , the statements required to 8 be mailed under subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ , or provided under 9 subsection 2, paragraph âcâ ; and the public hearing notice 10 required under subsection 4 , paragraph âbâ . The statements 11 required under subsection 2, paragraph âbâ , shall be clear, 12 concise, written in plain language, and may be presented 13 using tables, written narrative, and graphic representations 14 and shall contain the internet site, mailing address, and a 15 telephone number for each political subdivision that owners 16 and taxpayers may call if they have questions related to the 17 statement. 18 Sec. 69. Section 24.2A, subsection 4, paragraph b, 19 subparagraph (4), subparagraph division (a), Code 2026, is 20 amended to read as follows: 21 (a) Notice of the public hearing was provided to each 22 property owner and each taxpayer within the political 23 subdivision in statements required under subsection 2 , 24 paragraph âbâ . 25 Sec. 70. Section 24.3, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 26 is amended to read as follows: 27 A municipality shall not certify or levy in any fiscal year 28 any tax on property subject to taxation unless and until the 29 following estimates have been made, filed, and considered, 30 and for school districts, the individual statements have been 31 mailed or posted, as applicable, and public hearings held, as 32 provided in this chapter : 33 Sec. 71. Section 331.434, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 34 amended to read as follows: 35 -34- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 34/ 57 H.F. 2745 3. Following, and not until, the requirements of section 1 24.2A are completed, the board shall set a time and place for 2 a public hearing on the budget before the final certification 3 date and shall publish notice of the hearing not less than 4 ten nor more than twenty days prior to the hearing in the 5 county newspapers selected under chapter 349 . A summary of 6 the proposed budget and a description of the procedure for 7 protesting the county budget under section 331.436 , in the form 8 prescribed by the director of the department of management, 9 shall be included in the notice. Proof of publication of 10 the notice under this subsection 3 shall be filed with and 11 preserved by the county auditor. A levy is not valid unless 12 and until the notice is published and individual statements 13 under section 24.2A are mailed or posted . The department of 14 management shall prescribe the form for the public hearing 15 notice for use by counties. 16 Sec. 72. Section 331.435, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 2. The board shall prepare and adopt a budget amendment in 19 the same manner as the original budget as provided in section 20 331.434 , but excluding the requirements for mailing individual 21 statements under section 24.2A , and the amendment is subject 22 to protest as provided in section 331.436 , except that the 23 director of the department of management may by rule provide 24 that amendments of certain types or up to certain amounts may 25 be made without public hearing and without being subject to 26 protest. A county budget for the ensuing fiscal year shall be 27 amended by May 31 to allow time for a protest hearing to be 28 held and a decision rendered before June 30. An amendment of 29 a budget after May 31 which is properly appealed but without 30 adequate time for hearing and decision before June 30 is void. 31 Sec. 73. Section 384.17, Code 2026, is amended to read as 32 follows: 33 384.17 Levy by county. 34 At the time required by law, the county board of supervisors 35 -35- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 35/ 57 H.F. 2745 shall levy the taxes necessary for each city fund for the 1 following fiscal year. The levy must be as shown in the 2 adopted city budget and as certified by the clerk, subject to 3 any changes made after a protest hearing, and any additional 4 tax rates approved at a city election. A city levy is not valid 5 until proof of publication or posting of notice of a budget 6 hearing under section 384.16, subsection 3 , is filed with the 7 county auditor and individual statements are mailed or posted 8 under section 24.2A . 9 Sec. 74. Section 384.18, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 2. A budget amendment must be prepared and adopted in the 12 same manner as the original budget, as provided in section 13 384.16 , excluding the requirement for the mailing of individual 14 statements under section 24.2A , and is subject to protest as 15 provided in section 384.19 , except that the committee may by 16 rule provide that amendments of certain types or up to certain 17 amounts may be made without public hearing and without being 18 subject to protest. A city budget shall be amended by May 19 31 of the current fiscal year to allow time for a protest 20 hearing to be held and a decision rendered before June 30. The 21 amendment of a budget after May 31, which is properly appealed 22 but without adequate time for hearing and decision before June 23 30 is void. 24 Sec. 75. IMPLEMENTATION OF DIVISION OF ACT. Section 25B.2, 25 subsection 3, shall not apply to this division of this Act. 26 Sec. 76. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 27 to political subdivision budgets for fiscal years beginning on 28 or after July 1, 2027. 29 DIVISION XII 30 DIVISION OF REVENUE ââ DATA CENTERS 31 Sec. 77. Section 403.19, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 32 2026, is amended to read as follows: 33 a. That portion of the taxes each year in excess of such 34 amount shall be allocated to and when collected be paid into 35 -36- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 36/ 57 H.F. 2745 a special fund of the municipality to pay the principal of 1 and interest on loans, moneys advanced to, or indebtedness, 2 whether funded, refunded, assumed, or otherwise, including 3 bonds issued under the authority of section 403.9, subsection 4 1 , incurred by the municipality to finance or refinance, in 5 whole or in part, an urban renewal project within the area, 6 and to provide assistance for low and moderate income family 7 housing as provided in section 403.22 . However, except 8 as provided in paragraph âbâ , taxes for the regular and 9 voter-approved physical plant and equipment levy of a school 10 district imposed pursuant to section 298.2 , foundation property 11 taxes of a school district imposed under section 257.3 levied 12 against property that is a qualified data center or upon 13 which a qualified data center is operated, and taxes for the 14 instructional support program of a school district imposed 15 pursuant to section 257.19 , taxes for the payment of bonds 16 and interest of each taxing district, and taxes imposed under 17 section 346.27, subsection 22 , related to joint county-city 18 buildings shall be collected against all taxable property 19 within the taxing district without limitation by the provisions 20 of this subsection . For purposes of this paragraph, âqualified 21 data centerâ means a data center, as defined in section 423.3, 22 subsection 95, for which site preparation activities, as 23 defined in section 423.3, subsection 95, began on or after the 24 effective date of this division of this Act. 25 Sec. 78. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 26 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 27 Sec. 79. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 28 to property taxes due and payable in fiscal years beginning on 29 or after July 1, 2027. 30 DIVISION XIII 31 ELECTION DATES ââ BONDS 32 Sec. 80. Section 39.2, subsection 4, paragraph d, Code 2026, 33 is amended to read as follows: 34 d. For any political subdivision of this state, if the 35 -37- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 37/ 57 H.F. 2745 special election is in whole or in part for the question of 1 issuing bonds or other indebtedness, the first Tuesday after 2 the first Monday in June or the first Tuesday after the first 3 Monday in November. However, a political subdivision shall 4 not hold an election on the question of issuing bonds or other 5 indebtedness on two consecutive election dates authorized under 6 this paragraph. 7 DIVISION XIV 8 EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES LEVY 9 Sec. 81. Section 422D.1, subsection 1, paragraph a, 10 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 (2) (a) An For fiscal years beginning before July 1, 2027, 12 an ad valorem property tax not to exceed seventy-five cents per 13 one thousand dollars of assessed value on all taxable property 14 within the county. 15 (b) For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2027, 16 an ad valorem property tax not to exceed one dollar and fifty 17 cents per one thousand dollars of assessed value on all taxable 18 property within the county. However, for counties authorized 19 to impose the ad valorem property tax under this subparagraph 20 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, the maximum levy 21 rate for such county shall not exceed a rate of seventy-five 22 cents per one thousand dollars of assessed value unless a rate 23 in excess thereof, not to exceed one dollar and fifty cents 24 per one thousand dollars of assessed value, is approved at an 25 election held on or after July 1, 2026. 26 DIVISION XV 27 UTILITY REPLACEMENT TAX TASK FORCE 28 Sec. 82. Section 437A.15, subsection 7, paragraph b, Code 29 2026, is amended to read as follows: 30 b. The task force shall study the accuracy of the taxes 31 imposed under this chapter and chapter 437B, ways to modernize 32 the administration of such taxes, methods of simplifying 33 administration of the replacement taxes, elimination of 34 property taxes imposed under this chapter or chapter 437B, 35 -38- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 38/ 57 H.F. 2745 simplification of thresholds for replacement tax rate 1 adjustments while retaining tax stability, the effects of 2 the replacement such taxes under this chapter and chapter 3 437B on local taxing authorities, local taxing districts, 4 consumers, and taxpayers through January 1, 2024 December 31, 5 2026, including ways to maintain continuity for local taxing 6 districts and consumers and ways to provide a competitive 7 and equitable tax environment for taxpayers . If the task 8 force recommends modifications to the replacement tax that 9 will further the purposes of tax neutrality for local taxing 10 authorities, local taxing districts, taxpayers, and consumers, 11 consistent with the stated purposes of this chapter taxes , the 12 department of management shall transmit those recommendations 13 to the general assembly. 14 Sec. 83. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 15 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 16 DIVISION XVI 17 SCHOOL DISTRICT UNSPENT BALANCES ââ ON-TIME FUNDING AND 18 MODIFIED SUPPLEMENTAL AMOUNTS 19 Sec. 84. Section 257.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 20 following new subsection: 21 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Unspent balances. For school budget 22 years beginning on or after July 1, 2026, a school districtâs 23 actual unspent balance from the preceding year used to 24 calculate the authorized budget under subsection 1 shall 25 not exceed an amount equal to thirty-five percent of the 26 school districtâs authorized expenditures for the budget year 27 immediately preceding the base year unless a greater amount 28 is authorized by the school budget review committee based on 29 one or more grounds authorized for the approval of a modified 30 supplemental amount under section 257.31. 31 Sec. 85. Section 257.13, Code 2026, is amended to read as 32 follows: 33 257.13 On-time funding budget adjustment. 34 1. a. For the school budget year beginning July 1, 2001, 35 -39- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 39/ 57 H.F. 2745 and succeeding budget years beginning before July 1, 2026 , if a 1 districtâs actual enrollment for the budget year, determined 2 under section 257.6 , is greater than its budget enrollment for 3 the budget year, the district shall be eligible to receive an 4 on-time funding budget adjustment. The adjustment shall be in 5 an amount equal to the difference between the actual enrollment 6 for the budget year and the budget enrollment for the budget 7 year, multiplied by the district cost per pupil. 8 2. b. The board of directors of a school district that 9 wishes to receive an on-time funding budget adjustment under 10 this subsection shall adopt a resolution to receive the 11 adjustment and notify the school budget review committee 12 annually, but not earlier than November 1, as determined by the 13 department of education. The school budget review committee 14 shall establish a modified supplemental amount pursuant to 15 subsection 1 paragraph âaâ . 16 2. a. For the school budget years beginning on or after 17 July 1, 2026, if a districtâs actual enrollment for the budget 18 year, determined under section 257.6, is greater than its 19 budget enrollment for the budget year, the district may request 20 an on-time budget adjustment. The adjustment shall not exceed 21 an amount equal to the difference between the actual enrollment 22 for the budget year and the budget enrollment for the budget 23 year, multiplied by the district cost per pupil. 24 b. To request an on-time budget adjustment under this 25 subsection, the board of directors of a school district shall 26 adopt a resolution to receive the adjustment and notify the 27 school budget review committee on or before a date established 28 by the committee. The school budget review committee may 29 establish a modified supplemental amount pursuant to paragraph 30 âaâ . 31 3. If the board of directors of a school district determines 32 that a need exists for additional funds exceeding the on-time 33 funding budget adjustment pursuant to this section , a request 34 for a modified supplemental amount based upon increased 35 -40- LSB 6158HV (4) 91 md/jh 40/ 57 H.F. 2745 enrollment may be submitted to the school budget review 1 committee as provided in section 257.31 . 2 Sec. 86. NEW SECTION . 279.63A Unspent balance ââ policy. 3 1. The board of directors of each school district shall 4 establish a policy that defines a targeted range and maximum 5 amount of unspent balance of authorized expenditures, 6 determined by a percent of authorized expenditures under 7 section 257.7 or other methodology specified in the policy. 8 The policy shall also state the date the policy was adopted 9 and the date the policy was most recently reviewed or revised 10 under subsection 2. The targeted range and maximum amount 11 established in the policy shall be made with the intent to 12 equalize educational opportunity, provide a good education 13 for all the children of the school district, provide property 14 tax relief, decrease the percentage of school costs paid from 15 property taxes, and to provide reasonable control of school 16 costs. 17 2. Targeted ranges and maximum amounts defined in the policy 18 under subsection 1 shall be reviewed annually by the board of 19 directors and such review shall be entered in the minutes of 20 the board and approved revisions shall be made to the policy. 21 Sec. 87. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 22 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 23